District of Columbia statutes.
38-1808.58

Expired

Expiration date.

Expired.

Apr. 26, 1996, 110 Stat. 1321 [276], Pub. L. 104-134, § 2858
Expiration of subchapter VIII: Pub. L. 104-134, § 258, codified as § 38-1808.58, provided that this subchapter shall be effective during the period beginning on April 26, 1996 and ending 7 years after such date.
1981 Ed., § 31-2853.88.